test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aaresm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ääʹrešm e-stem likasnko: # Noun - full paradigm
     ääʹrešm+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ääʹrešm
     ääʹrešm+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ääʹrešm
     ääʹrešm+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ääʹrešm
     ääʹrešm+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: äʹršma
     ääʹrešm+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: äʹršmest
     ääʹrešm+N+Sg+Com+Indef: äʹršmin
     ääʹrešm+N+Ess+Indef: äʹršmen
     ääʹrešm+N+Par+Indef: äʹršmed
     ääʹrešm+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ääʹrešmtaa, ääʹrešmtää]
     ääʹrešm+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ääʹrešm
     ääʹrešm+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: äʹršmi
     ääʹrešm+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: äʹršmid
     ääʹrešm+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: äʹršmid
     ääʹrešm+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: äʹršmin
     ääʹrešm+N+Pl+Com+Indef: äʹršmivuiʹm
     ääʹrešm+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [äʹršmitaa, äʹršmitää]
